Hawaii statutes.
[§321-27.5] Audit of sanitation
branch. The department shall perform annual audits of the sanitation
branch to be completed by November 30 of each year, and shall include an
audit of:

(1) Fees collected;

(2) The number and results of sanitation inspections;

(3) The number of training seminars held; and

(4) The cost of training personnel in the sanitation
branch. [L 1997, c 334, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next